Hawaii statutes.
[§304A-2005] Special and revolving funds;
management. In managing special and revolving funds under its control, the
board of regents shall ensure that:

(1) The purposes for which special and revolving
funds are expended, encumbered, or transferred benefit those upon whom fees and
charges are imposed through these funds; and

(2) Fees and charges are fair and equitable with
respect to the level and quality of services provided to those upon whom fees
and charges are imposed. [L 2006, c 75, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next